src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Verb inflection in Vepsian

## Lexica from the *stems* file

### Irregular verbs
V_EI all forms of the *ei* verb

### Regular verbs

largest verb group vedada:ved (even number of syllables in stem)
V_ada/ab/i/agaha =  vedada:ved
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

split from largest verb group vedada:ved (even number of syllables in stem)
armahtagha odd number of syllables in stem
V_ada/ab/i/agha =  armahtada:armaht
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ata/ab/oi/akaha =  ahjata:ahj
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg,

preterite stem vowel

V_da/vab/voi/gaha =  kaida:kai
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg,

preterite stem vowel

V_da/ab/oi/gaha =  nagrda:nagr
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

preterite stem vowel

V_ada/ab/oi/agaha =  jagada:jag
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

preterite stem vowel

V_uda/ub/ui/ugaha =  sünduda:sünd
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

preterite stem vowel

V_da/b/i/gaha =  sanuda:sanu
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

preterite stem vowel

V_1Syl_da/b/i/gha =  joda:jo
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/ab/i/kaha = ülenzoitta:ülenzoit, čorskta:čorsk
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha = avaita:avai, avaidab avaiži
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/dab/zi/kaha = amunta:amun
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ata/tab/si/kaha = saubata:saub %^DEVOICE
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_eta/DVteb/DVsi/ekaha = langeta:lang %^DEVOICE , cf. saubata
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_1Syl_ta/dab/zi/kaha = teta:te
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/dab/di/kaha = souta:sou
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_DVta/äb/i/DVkaha = sirtta:sird
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_1Syl_DVta/ab/i/DVkaha = pörtta:pörd
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_tta/cheb/chi/tkaha abidoitta:adivoi 
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/cheb/chi/kaha adivoita:adivoi
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_1Syl_ta/cheb/chi/kaha loita:loi
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_da/cheb/chi/kaha dominoida:dominoi
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_da/b/0/gaha adivoita:adivoi
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_da/eb/i/gaha = arvostelda:arvostel
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_eda/eb/i/egaha = arvostelda:arvostel
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/ndab/nzi/kaha = henota:heno
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha = virigata:viriga
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/neb/ni/kaha = harjeta:harje, pageta:page
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ata/neb/ni/akaha = hapata:hap
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_eta/neb/ni/ekaha = küpseta:küps
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/ib/i/kaha = bruncta:brunc
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_da/ib/i/gaha = barabanda:baraban, hobda:hob
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/ab/oi/kaha = kastta:kast
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/eb/i/kaha = joksta:joks
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_2Syl_DVta/eb/i/DVkaha = pagišta:pagiž
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_1Syl_DVta/ub/i/DVkaha = seišta:seiž
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_1Syl_DVta/eb/i/DVkaha = pesta:pez only for verbs with devoicing
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_1Syl_DVta/eb/i/ggaha = pesta:pez only for verbs with devoicing
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_kta/gub/gui/ggaha = kirkta:kir
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_kta/gib/gi/ggaha = henkta:hen
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_pta/bub/bui/pkaha = kirkta:kir
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_elta/leb/li/elkaha = muštelta:mušt
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_??

V_1Syl_DVta/ab/oi/DVkaha = antta:and
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_TUNTTA = tuntta:tund
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_LAEHTTA = lähtta:lä singlet
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_1Syl_DVta/ub/ui/DVkaha = ampta:amb
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/ub/ui/kaha = kacta:kac
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/ob/oi/kaha = uskta:usk
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_kta/gab/goi/ggaha = haikta:hai
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_kta/gab/gi/ggaha = haikta:hai
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_kta/geb/gi/ggaha = polkta:pol
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da %^DEVOICE

preterite stem vowel

V_äda/äb/i/ägaha = eläda:el
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_ta/äb/i/kaha = heitta:heit, heitäb heiti
preceding vowel always required for affix
refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_OLDA (adding :ole to vowstem)

refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg

sometimes requires preceding vowel

problems with tta, ta, da

preterite stem vowel

V_TEHTA = tehta:te (adding :ge to vowst and indprs3)

V_SIRTA =  sirta:sir

V_JOKSTA = joksta:joks

V_LETA = leta:le

V_MAKSTA = maksta:maks

V_ASTTA = astta:ast

V_HUBETA = hubeta:hube

V_OTTA = otta:ot

V_ABIDOITTA = abidoitta:abidoi

V_OIGETA

V_TUGETA = tugeta:tuge

V_HOMAITA =  homaita:homai

V_VALITA  =  valita:vali

### Default lexicon

V_ default verb lexicon

## The three contlex types ??2024-11-08

### PNDPRS3
